Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB444.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 281A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license shall be marked "commercial driver's license" and "CDL" and shall be, to the
maximum extent practicable, tamper proof. It shall include but is not limited to the following information:
(a) The name and present resident address of the licensee;
(b) The licensee's photograph;
(c) A physical description of the licensee including sex, height, weight, and eye color;
(d) The licensee's date of birth;
(e) The licensee's signature;
(f) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that the person is authorized to drive together
with any endorsements or restrictions;
(g) The name of this state;
(h) The dates between which the license is valid; and
(i) Any other information required by the cabinet, except for a person's Social Security number.
(2) A commercial driver's license issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation that either:
(a) The commercial driver's license is a voluntary travel ID identity document that complies with the
security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II, and may be used for identification for
federal purposes; or
(b) The commercial driver's license shall not be used for federal identification purposes.
(3) A commercial driver's license shall be issued with classifications, endorsements, and restrictions. Vehicles that
require an endorsement shall not be driven unless the proper endorsement appears on the license and the
applicant has passed the knowledge and skills test required by the State Police.
(a) Classifications:
1. Class A - Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand
and one (26,001) pounds or more, if the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is
in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds. Licensees with an "A" classification may with the
proper endorsement drive Class B and C vehicles;
2. Class B - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand and one
(26,001) pounds or more, and any vehicle towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand
(10,000) pounds gross vehicle weight rating. Licensees with a "B" classification may with the
proper endorsements drive Class C vehicles;
3. Class C - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less than twenty-six thousand
and one (26,001) pounds or any vehicle towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not
in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds which includes:
a. Vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers, including the driver; or
b. Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which requires the vehicle to be
placarded under 49 C.F.R. secs. 172.500 to 172.560, as adopted by administrative
regulations of the cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
4. Class D - All other vehicles not listed in any other class, including mopeds; and
5. Class M - Motorcycles. Licensees with a "M" classification may also drive mopeds.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(b) Endorsements:
1. "H" - Authorizes the driver to operate a vehicle transporting hazardous materials;
2. "T" - Authorizes operation of double trailers and triple trailers in those jurisdictions allowing the
operation of triple trailers;
3. "P" - Authorizes operation of vehicles carrying passengers;
4. "N" - Authorizes operation of tank vehicles;
5. "X" - Authorizes operation of combination of hazardous materials and tank vehicle
endorsements;
6. "R" - Authorizes operation of all other endorsements not otherwise specified; and
7. "S" - Authorizes operation of school buses.
(c) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS
Chapter 13A to outline restrictions on the operation of commercial vehicles and the associated codes to
identify such restrictions, which shall appear on the face of the commercial driver's license.
(4) Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver's license, the cabinet shall notify the commercial
driver's license information system of that fact, providing all information required to ensure identification of
the person.
(5) A commercial driver's license issued to a resident pursuant to this chapter shall expire in eight (8) years unless
the license was issued to a resident under the age of twenty-one (21).
(6) A person under the age of twenty-one (21):
(a) Shall not be:
1. Licensed to operate a Class A, B, or C vehicle unless he or she has a "K" restriction; or
2. Allowed to operate a school bus; and
(b) Who holds a valid CDL may be issued a hazardous materials endorsement to transport hazardous
materials in intrastate commerce.
(7) A commercial driver with a "K" restriction shall not drive a commercial motor vehicle in interstate commerce,
unless he or she is exempt pursuant to 49 C.F.R. sec. 391.2[. A commercial driver under the age of twenty-one
(21) shall not be allowed to operate a school bus or a vehicle transporting hazardous material in intrastate
commerce].
(8)[(7)] The holder of a commercial driver's license shall be considered to hold a valid Kentucky driver's license
issued under the provisions of KRS 186.4102 and 186.412.
Section 2. KRS 281A.185 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Commonwealth shall not mask, defer imposition of judgment, or allow an individual to enter into a
diversion program that would prevent a CLP or CDL holder's conviction for any violation, in any type of
motor vehicle, of a state or local traffic control law from appearing on the CDLIS driver record, whether the
driver's conviction was[driver was convicted] for an offense committed in the Commonwealth or another
state.
(2) This section shall not apply to the following violations:
(a) Parking;
(b) Vehicle weight; or
(c) Vehicle defect.
(3) When any actions under subsection (1) of this section occur, the conviction must be reported from the court
to the licensing agency to be recorded on the driver's record and trigger any appropriate disqualifying
action.
Signed by Governor March 31, 2025.

CHAPTER 134 3
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version